Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB174.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Erosion and Sediment Control Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Administratively complete." Contains the necessary information, maps, fees and other documents requested as part of the permit application process, notwithstanding whether the information, maps and other documents would be sufficient to justify issuance of the permit."Conservation district." A conservation district, as defined in section 3(c) of the act of May 15, 1945 (P.L.547, No.217), 1234567891011121314151617 known as the Conservation District Law, which has a delegation agreement executed with the department to administer and enforce all or a portion of the requirements under 25 Pa. Code Ch. 102 (relating to erosion and sediment control)."Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Earth disturbance." A construction activity or other human activity which disturbs the surface of the land."Expedited application." An application for a permit which is signed and sealed by a licensed professional."Licensed professional." A professional engineer, landscape architect, geologist or land surveyor licensed to practice in this Commonwealth."Oil and gas activities." Activities associated with oil and gas exploration, production, gathering, processing, treatment operations or transmission facilities."Permit." An erosion and sediment control permit required under this act.Section 3. Erosion and sediment control permits.(a) Permit requirement.--A person seeking to commence a project involving oil and gas activities that will cause five acres or more of earth disturbance at one time shall submit an application and obtain a permit from the department or a conservation district before commencing the project.(b) Review and issuance of permit.--(1) The department or conservation district shall complete a review of a permit application within five business days of receipt to determine whether the permit application is administratively complete, including entering receipt of the application into the department's publicly 20250SB0174PN0112 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accessible online permit tracking system. If a permit application is determined to be incomplete, the applicant shall be notified in writing within five business days. The notification shall specify the deficiency of the permit application.(2) If a permit application complies with 25 Pa. Code Ch. 102 (relating to erosion and sediment control) and is complete as determined by the department or a conservation district, the department or conservation district shall issue a permit to the applicant within 43 business days of determining that the application is administratively complete or within 14 business days of determining that the application is administratively complete in the case of an expedited application.(3) If the department determines that the permit application is technically deficient in that it does not comply with 25 Pa. Code Ch. 102, notification to the applicant shall specify each provision with which the application does not comply. Nothing under this paragraph shall be construed to extend the permit review time periods under paragraph (2).(4) The department shall create and implement an expedited permit process for an application which is signed and sealed by a licensed professional. An expedited permit may be utilized for all projects except the following:(i) Projects in a watershed designated as high quality or exceptional value under 25 Pa. Code Ch. 93 (relating to water quality standards).(ii) Projects located entirely in or on a floodplain.20250SB0174PN0112 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Projects on lands that are known to be currently contaminated by the release of regulated substances as defined in section 103 of the act of May 19, 1995 (P.L.4, No.2), known as the Land Recycling and Environmental Remediation Standards Act.(iv) Transmission projects.(5) If a permit application is denied, the department or conservation district shall notify the applicant in writing within five business days of denying the permit application. The notification shall specify the justification for denying the permit application, including citing the relevant law or regulation of this Commonwealth which is not sufficiently addressed in the permit.Section 4. Compliance with laws of this Commonwealth.The department or a conservation district shall utilize a general permit to implement this act. The general permit shall impose only those terms that are strictly necessary to ensure compliance with the laws of this Commonwealth administered by the department.Section 5. Fees.A permit application shall be accompanied by a $500 administrative filing fee, plus an additional $100 for each disturbed acre. Fees shall be paid to the primary reviewing entity in the event that both the department and a conservation district complete the review. No earlier than three years after the effective date of this section, the Environmental Quality Board may, by regulation, increase the fee to cover the administrative costs of processing the permit applications.Section 6. Quarterly reports.(a) Contents.--The department shall submit a quarterly 20250SB0174PN0112 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 report to the Environmental Resources and Energy Committee of the Senate and the Environmental Resources and Energy Committee of the House of Representatives detailing the department's implementation of this act. The report shall contain the following:(1) The number of permit applications received in the prior 12 months.(2) The number of applications approved.(3) The average time frame from date of submission for administrative review of permit applications, organized by the regional office of the department.(4) The average time frame from the date of submission for technical review of applications, organized by the regional office of the department.(5) The number of permit application reviewers on staff in the department, organized by regional office of the department.(6) The average workload of each permit application reviewer, which shall be organized by the regional office of the department.(7) Primary reasons for administrative or technical deficiencies or permit application denials, including the citations to the relevant laws or regulations of this Commonwealth which were not sufficiently addressed in each application, which shall be organized by the regional office of the department.(8) The number of licensed professionals sanctioned by the department due to the submission of routinely deficient expedited applications and the primary reasons for the sanctions.20250SB0174PN0112 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (9) Details, including dates and locations, of professional trainings administered or sponsored by the department related to the permit requirements imposed under this act.(10) Other relevant information as determined by the department.(b) Submission.--The initial quarterly report shall be submitted within 60 days of the effective date of this subsection. Subsequent quarterly reports shall be submitted no later than 30 days after the last day of the preceding quarter.Section 7. Annual evaluation.The department shall annually commission an evaluation of the erosion and sediment control permit review process. The evaluation shall be conducted by a qualified, third-party entity knowledgeable in the department's permitting application process. The evaluation shall, at a minimum, examine and include the following:(1) Consistency in application review time frames and criteria among the department's regional offices, including among conservation districts.(2) Adherence by department and conservation district permit review staff to established permit review protocols.(3) Sufficiency of available professional trainings for department and conservation district permit review staff and the regulated community.(4) Recommendations on increasing the effectiveness, consistency and predictability of the permit review process.Section 8. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to exempt a person seeking to commence a project involving oil and gas activities 20250SB0174PN0112 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that will cause less than five acres of earth disturbance and that is not required to obtain a permit from complying with other applicable provisions of 25 Pa. Code Ch. 102 (relating to erosion and sediment control).Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250SB0174PN0112 - 7 - 123456